Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 28. Financing of New Industry Development

154.28-010.
Definitions for KRS 154.28-010 to 154.28-100.

As used in KRS 154.28-010 to 154.28-100, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Activation date” means a date selected by an approved company in the agreement at any time within the two (2) year period after the date of final approval of the agreement by the authority;

“Affiliate” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.22-010;

“Agreement” means the tax incentive agreement entered into, pursuant to KRS 154.28-090, between the authority and an approved company with respect to an economic development project;

“Agribusiness” means any activity involving the processing of raw agricultural products, including timber, or the providing of value-added functions with regard to raw agricultural products;

“Approved company” means any eligible company, approved by the authority pursuant to KRS 154.28-080, requiring an economic development project;

“Approved costs” means:

Obligations incurred for labor and to vendors, contractors, subcontractors, builders, suppliers, deliverymen, and materialmen in connection with the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, and installation of an economic development project;

The cost of contract bonds and of insurance of all kinds that may be required or necessary during the course of acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, and installation of an economic project which is not paid by the vendor, supplier, deliverymen, contractors, or otherwise else provided;

All costs of architectural and engineering services, including estimates, plans and specifications, preliminary investigations, and supervision of construction, rehabilitation, and installation, as well as for the performance of all the duties required by or consequent upon the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, and installation of an economic development project;

All costs which shall be required to be paid under the terms of any contract for the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, and installation of an economic development project;

All costs which shall be required for the installation of utilities such as water, sewer, sewer treatment, gas, electricity, communications, railroads, and similar facilities, and including offsite construction of the facilities paid for by the approved company; and

All other costs comparable to those described above;

“Assessment” means the job development assessment fee authorized by KRS 154.28-010 to 154.28-100;

“Authority” means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority created by KRS 154.20-010;

“Average hourly wage” means the wage and employment data published by the Department of Workforce Investment in the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet collectively translated into wages per hour based on a two thousand eighty (2,080) hour work year for the following sectors:

Manufacturing;

Transportation, communications, and public utilities;

Wholesale and retail trade;

Finance, insurance, and real estate; and

Services;

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Economic development project” or “project” means and includes:
(11) (a)

“Economic development project” or “project” means and includes:

The acquisition of ownership in any real estate by the approved manufacturing or agribusiness company or its affiliate;

The present ownership of real estate by the approved manufacturing or agribusiness company or its affiliate;

The acquisition or present ownership of improvements or facilities, as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, on land which is possessed or is to be possessed by the approved company pursuant to a ground lease having a term of sixty (60) years or more; and

The legal possession of facilities by an approved company or its affiliate pursuant to a lease having a term equal to or greater than ten (10) years with a third-party entity, negotiated at arm’s length, if the facility will be used by the approved company to conduct the approved activity for which the inducement has been granted. An economic development project qualifying under this subparagraph shall only be eligible for credits against equipment and costs related to installation of equipment and for purposes of the tax credits provided under the provisions of KRS 154.28-010 to 154.28-090 only to the extent of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per job created by and maintained at the economic development project. Notwithstanding KRS 154.28-090, an economic development project qualifying under this subparagraph shall be eligible only for the aggregate assessments pursuant to KRS 154.28-110 withheld by the approved company each year and shall not be eligible for credit against Kentucky income tax and limited liability entity tax.

For purposes of paragraph (a)1. and 2. of this subsection, ownership of real estate shall only include fee ownership of real estate and possession of real estate pursuant to a capital lease as determined in accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 13, Accounting for Leases, issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board, November 1976. With respect to paragraph (a)1., 2., and 3. of this subsection, the construction, installation, equipping, and rehabilitating of improvements, including fixtures and equipment directly involved in the manufacturing process, and facilities necessary or desirable for improvement of the real estate shall include: surveys, site tests, and inspections; subsurface site work and excavation; removal of structures, roadways, cemeteries, and other site obstructions; filling, grading, provision of drainage, and storm water retention; installation of utilities such as water, sewer, sewage treatment, gas, electricity, communications, and similar facilities; offsite construction of utility extensions to the boundaries of the real estate; and the acquisition, installation, equipping, and rehabilitation of manufacturing facilities or agribusiness operations on the real estate for the use of the approved company or its affiliates for manufacturing or agribusiness operational purposes. Pursuant to paragraph (a)3. and 4. of this subsection and this paragraph, an economic development project shall not include lease payments made pursuant to a ground lease for purposes of the tax credits provided under the provisions of KRS 154.28-010 to 154.28-100. An economic development project shall include the equipping of a facility with equipment but, for purposes of the tax credits provided under the provisions of KRS 154.28-010 to 154.28-090, only to the extent of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per job created by and maintained at the economic development project;

“Eligible company” means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, trust, or any other entity engaged in manufacturing or agribusiness operations;

“Employee benefits” means nonmandated costs paid by an eligible company for its full-time employees for health insurance, life insurance, dental insurance, vision insurance, defined benefits, 401(k), or similar plans;

“Full-time employee” means a person employed by an approved company for a minimum of thirty-five (35) hours per week and subject to the state income tax imposed by KRS 141.020;

“Inducement” means the assessment or the Kentucky income tax credit as set forth in KRS 154.28-090;

“Manufacturing” means any activity involving the manufacturing, processing, assembling, or production of any property, including the processing resulting in a change in the conditions of the property, and any activity functionally related to it, together with storage, warehousing, distribution, and related office facilities; however, “manufacturing” shall not include mining, coal or mineral processing, or extraction of minerals;

“State agency” shall have the meaning assigned to the term in KRS 56.440(8);

“Kentucky gross profits” means “Kentucky gross profits” as defined in KRS 141.0401; and

“Kentucky gross receipts” means “Kentucky gross receipts” as defined in KRS 141.0401.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 363, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 390, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 450, § 27, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 499, § 26, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 51, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 337, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 321, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 338, § 37, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 105, § 16, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 149, § 220, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 211, § 75, effective July 12, 2006; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 59, effective June 28, 2006; 2007, ch. 75, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 11, § 43, effective June 25, 2009; 2019 ch. 146, § 24, effective June 27, 2019.

154.28-015.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that the general welfare and material well-being of the citizens of the Commonwealth depends in large measure upon the development and growth of industry in the Commonwealth, and that it is in the best interest of the Commonwealth to induce the location of agribusiness, electric generation, or manufacturing facilities within the Commonwealth in order to advance the public purposes of relieving unemployment by creating new jobs that would not exist if not for the inducements to be offered by the authority to approved companies, and by creating sources of tax revenues for the support of the public services provided by the Commonwealth, and that the authority prescribed by KRS 154.28-015 to 154.28-100, and the purposes to be accomplished under the provisions of KRS 154.28-015 to 154.28-100, are proper governmental and public purposes for which public moneys may be expended, and that the inducement of the location of agribusiness, electric generation, or manufacturing facilities is of paramount importance, mandating that the provisions of KRS 154.28-015 to 154.28-100 be liberally construed and applied in order to advance the public purposes.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 363, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 390, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 52, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 321, § 6, effective July 14, 2000.

154.28-020.
Kentucky Industrial Development Authority. [Repealed.]

154.28-030.
Powers of authority. [Repealed.]

154.28-040.
Staff.

The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development shall provide sufficient personnel to serve as staff for the authority in order to permit the authority to adequately discharge its duties and responsibilities prescribed in KRS 154.28-015 to 154.28-090 and 141.400.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 363, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

154.28-050.
Personal liability of director or officer.

No director or officer of the authority shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of his execution of any obligation duly authorized by the authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 363, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

154.28-060.
Funding for authority.

The authority may accept and expend moneys which may be appropriated from time to time by the General Assembly, or moneys which may be received from any source, including income from the authority’s operations, for effectuating its purpose, including, but not limited to, the payment of the expenses of administration and operation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 363, § 7, effective July 14, 1992.

154.28-070.
Personal interest of director, officer, or employee in contract with authority.

No director, officer, or employee of the authority shall be interested, directly or indirectly, or shall be an officer or employee of or have an ownership interest in any firm or corporation interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract with the authority.

Should a director, officer, or employee of the authority have such an interest or be an officer or employee of or have an ownership interest in any such firm or corporation, then the director, officer, or employee of the authority shall:

Disclose the interest and the office, employment, or ownership in such firm or corporation;

Refrain from participating in discussions relating to any contract of the firm or corporation with the authority; and

Refrain from voting or otherwise taking action on any contract or proposed contract of the authority with the firm or corporation.

If any contract or agreements shall be made in violation of the provisions of this section, it shall be null and void and no action shall be maintained against the authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 363, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 30, effective July 15, 1994.

154.28-080.
Standards for approval of eligible companies and projects — Authorizing resolution.

The authority shall promulgate standards for the determination and approval of eligible companies and their economic development projects in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

The standards for approval of eligible companies and economic development projects shall include but not be limited to: the creditworthiness of eligible companies; the number of new jobs to be provided by an economic development project to the residents of the Commonwealth; and the likelihood of the economic success of the economic development project.

The economic development project shall involve a minimum investment of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) by the eligible company and shall result in the creation by the eligible company, within two (2) years from the date of the final resolution authorizing the economic development project, of a minimum of fifteen (15) new full-time jobs at the site of the economic development projects for Kentucky residents to be employed by the eligible company and to be held by persons subject to the personal income tax of the Commonwealth. The authority may extend this two (2) year period upon the written application of an eligible company requesting an extension.

Within six (6) months after the activation date, the approved company shall compensate a minimum of ninety percent (90%) of its full-time employees whose jobs were created with base hourly wages equal to either:
(4) (a)

Within six (6) months after the activation date, the approved company shall compensate a minimum of ninety percent (90%) of its full-time employees whose jobs were created with base hourly wages equal to either:

Seventy-five percent (75%) of the average hourly wage for the Commonwealth; or

Seventy-five percent (75%) of the average hourly wage for the county in which the project is to be undertaken.

If the base hourly wage calculated in paragraph (a)1. or 2. of this subsection is less than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage, then the base hourly wage shall be one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage. However, for projects receiving preliminary approval of the authority prior to July 1, 2008, the base hourly wage shall be one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage existing on January 1, 2007. In addition to the applicable base hourly wage calculated above, the eligible company shall provide employee benefits equal to at least fifteen percent (15%) of the applicable base hourly wage; however, if the eligible company does not provide employee benefits equal to at least fifteen percent (15%) of the applicable base hourly wage, the eligible company may qualify under this section if it provides the employees hired by the eligible company as a result of the economic development project total hourly compensation equal to or greater than one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the applicable base hourly wage through increased hourly wages combined with employee benefits.

No economic development project which will result in the replacement of a manufacturing or agribusiness facility existing within the Commonwealth shall be approved by the authority; however, the authority may approve an economic development project that:

Rehabilitates a manufacturing or agribusiness facility:

Which has not been in operation for a period of ninety (90) or more consecutive days;

For which the current occupant of the facility has published a notice of closure so long as the eligible company intending to acquire the facility is not an affiliate of the current occupant; or

To which the title is vested in other than the eligible company or an affiliate of the eligible company and that is sold or transferred pursuant to a foreclosure ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction or an order of a bankruptcy court of competent jurisdiction;

Replaces a manufacturing or agribusiness facility existing in the Commonwealth:

To which the title shall have been taken under the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or to which the title shall be the subject of a nonappealable judgment granting the authority to exercise the power of eminent domain, in either event to the extent that normal operations cannot be resumed at the facility within twelve (12) months; or

Which has been damaged or destroyed by fire or other casualty to the extent that normal operations cannot be resumed at the facility within twelve (12) months; or

Replaces an existing manufacturing or agribusiness facility located in the same county that cannot be expanded due to the unavailability of real estate at or adjacent to the manufacturing or agribusiness facility to be replaced. Any economic development project satisfying the requirements of this subsection shall be eligible only for inducements to the extent of the expansion, and no inducements shall be available for the equivalent of the manufacturing or agribusiness facility to be replaced. No economic development project otherwise satisfying the requirements of this subsection shall be approved by the authority that results in a lease abandonment or lease termination by the eligible company without the consent of the lessor.

With respect to each eligible company making an application to the authority for inducements, and with respect to these economic development projects described in the application which do not involve an expansion, the authority shall make inquiries and request materials of the applicant, including but not limited to written evidence that except for the receipt of inducements authorized by KRS 154.28-015 to 154.28-090 and KRS 141.400, the eligible company will not locate its economic development project within the Commonwealth. Upon the review of the application and completion of initial inquiries, the authority may, by resolution, give its preliminary approval by designating an eligible company as a preliminarily approved company and authorizing the undertaking of the economic development project.

After a diligent review of the relevant materials and completion of its inquiries, the authority, by resolution of its board of directors, may designate an eligible company to be an approved company.

All meetings of the board of directors of the authority shall be held in accordance with KRS 61.805 to 61.850. The board of directors of the authority may, pursuant to KRS 61.815, hold closed sessions of its meetings to discuss matters exempt from the open meetings law and pertaining to an eligible company.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 363, § 9, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 390, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 450, § 31, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 53, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 584, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 321, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 338, § 38, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 69, § 5, effective June 26, 2007.

154.28-090.
Agreements between authority and approved companies — Time limits — Tax credits and assessments as inducements for approved companies — Assignment of agreement — Documentation of expenditures — Suspension of inducements — Authority’s remedies in case of failure to comply — Activation date — Duties of Department of Revenue.

The authority, upon adoption of an authorizing resolution, may enter into, with any approved company, an agreement with respect to its economic development project. The terms and provisions of each agreement, including the amount of approved costs, shall be determined by negotiations between the authority and the approved company, except that each agreement shall include the following provisions:

The agreement shall set forth the maximum amount of inducements available to the approved company for recovery of the approved costs authorized by the authority and expended by the approved company.

The approved company shall expend the authorized approved costs within three (3) years of the date of the final approval by the authority.

The approved company shall provide the authority with documentation as to the expenditures for approved costs in a manner acceptable to the authority.

The agreement shall include the activation date and will terminate upon the earlier of the full receipt of the maximum amount of inducements by the approved company or ten (10) years from the activation date. To implement the activation date, the approved company shall notify the authority, the Kentucky Department of Revenue, and the approved company’s employees of the activation date on which implementation of the inducements authorized in the agreement shall occur. The activation date shall be the time when the maximum dollar value of equipment that constitutes a portion of the economic development project under KRS 154.28-010(11) shall be determined. If the approved company does not satisfy the minimum investment and minimum employment requirements of KRS 154.28-080(3) by the activation date, the approved company shall not be entitled to receive inducements pursuant to this subchapter until the approved company satisfies the requirements; however, the ten (10) year period for the term of the agreement shall begin from the activation date. Notwithstanding the previous sentence, if the approved company does not satisfy the minimum investment and minimum employment requirements of KRS 154.28-080(3) within two (2) years from the date of final approval of the agreement, then the approved company shall be ineligible to receive inducements under this subchapter unless an extension is approved by the authority.

The tax agreement shall also state that if the total number of new full-time employees at the site of the economic development project who are residents of the Commonwealth and subject to the Kentucky income tax is less than fifteen (15) at any time after activation, the authorized inducements shall be suspended for a period of up to one (1) year. If the company does not have at least fifteen (15) new full-time employees at the site who are residents of the Commonwealth and subject to Kentucky income tax within one (1) year from the date of the initial suspension, the inducements may be terminated at the discretion of the authority.

The approved company shall comply with the wage criteria set forth in KRS 154.28-080(4) and provide documentation in connection with wages paid to its full-time employees hired as a result of the economic development project in a manner acceptable to the authority.

The approved company may be permitted one of the following inducements during the term of the agreement and shall select the applicable inducement at the time of final approval by the authority:

A one hundred percent (100%) credit against the Kentucky income tax and the limited liability entity tax imposed under KRS 141.0401 that would otherwise be owed in the approved company’s fiscal year, as determined under KRS 141.400, to the Commonwealth by the approved company on the income, Kentucky gross profits, or Kentucky gross receipts of the approved company generated by or arising from the economic development project, with the ordering of credits as provided in KRS 141.0205; or

The aggregate assessments pursuant to KRS 154.28-110 withheld by the approved company each year.

Either the total tax credit or assessments may not exceed authorized cumulative approved costs paid by the approved company in the three (3) year period commencing with the date of final approval.

If the approved company elects to use the tax credit, the income tax and limited liability entity tax imposed under KRS 141.0401 credited to the approved company shall be credited for the fiscal year for which the tax return of the approved company is filed. The approved company shall not be required to pay estimated tax payments under KRS 141.044 on the Kentucky taxable income, Kentucky gross profits, or Kentucky gross receipts generated by or arising from the economic development project.

The agreement may be assigned by the approved company only upon the prior written consent of the authority following the adoption of a resolution by the authority to that effect.

The agreement shall provide that if an approved company fails to comply with its obligations under the agreement then the authority shall have the right, at its option, to:

Suspend either the income tax credits or assessments available to the approved company, pursuant to subsection (5) of this section;

Pursue any remedy provided under the agreement, including termination thereof; and

Pursue any other remedy at law to which it may be entitled.

All remedies provided in subsection (11) of this section shall be deemed to be cumulative.

By October 1 of each year, the Department of Revenue shall certify to the authority, in the form of an annual report, aggregate tax credits claimed on tax returns filed during the fiscal year ending June 30 of that year and assessments taken during the prior calendar year by approved companies with respect to their economic development projects under this subchapter, and shall certify to the authority, within ninety (90) days from the date an approved company has filed its state income tax return, when an approved company has taken tax credits or assessments equal to its total inducements.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 363, § 10, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 32, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 54, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 300, § 23, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 321, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 338, § 39, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 105, § 17, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 584, effective June 20, 2005; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 60, effective June 28, 2006; 2019 ch. 151, § 70, effective June 27, 2019.

154.28-100.
Application of law prior to July 15, 1994, in certain circumstances.

If the authority adopts a preliminary resolution designating an eligible company as an approved company and preliminarily approving the project of the eligible company as an economic development project prior to July 15, 1994, and the authority adopts a final resolution approving the eligible company as an approved company and the project of the eligible company as an economic development project, and the authority and the eligible company enter into a financing agreement no later than June 30, 1995, then the approved company thereafter shall be subject to KRS 154.28-010 to 154.28-090 as it existed prior to July 15, 1994.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 450, § 33, effective July 15, 1994.

154.28-101.
Short title for KRS 154.28-010 to 154.28-100.

KRS 154.28-010 to 154.28-100 shall be known as the Kentucky Industrial Development Act.

History.
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 194, § 50, effective July 15, 1996.

154.28-105.
Deadline for new applications — Governing law for outstanding approved projects.

New applications shall not be accepted or considered under this subchapter on or after June 26, 2009. All outstanding projects with preliminary or final approval under this subchapter as of June 26, 2009, shall continue to be governed by the provisions of this subchapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 28, effective June 26, 2009.

154.28-110.
Assessment based on employee’s gross wages — Employee tax credits.

The approved company or, with the authority’s consent, an affiliate of the approved company may require, in lieu of receiving the income tax credits described in KRS 154.28-090, that each employee subject to state tax imposed by KRS 141.020, as a condition of employment, agree to pay an assessment, equal to three percent (3%) of the gross wages of each employee whose job was created as a result of the economic development project, for the purpose of recovering authorized approved costs as set forth in the agreement.

Each employee so assessed shall be entitled to a credit against Kentucky income tax withheld as provided by KRS 141.310 and 141.350 equal to the assessment withheld from his or her wages during the calendar year.

If an approved company shall elect to impose the assessment as a condition of employment, it shall be authorized to deduct the assessment from each paycheck of each employee.

Any approved company collecting an assessment as provided in subsection (1) of this section shall make its payroll books and records available to the authority at such reasonable times as the authority shall request and shall file with the authority documentation respecting the assessment as the authority may require.

History.
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 194, § 55, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 466, § 3, effective April 21, 2000; 2002, ch. 338, § 40, effective July 15, 2002.

154.28-120.
Application to approved companies of KRS 154.28-010, 154.28-080, 154.28-090, and 154.28-110. [Repealed.]

154.28-130.
Costs of remediation of property as eligible costs.

Costs incurred by an applicant in remediating a property in accordance with KRS 224.1-510 to 224.1-532 shall be considered eligible costs for the purposes of KRS 154.28-010 to 154.28-100.

History.
Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 128, § 14, effective June 21, 2001.

154.28-140.
Application of subchapter to companies that are approved and that enter into agreements by certain dates.

If the authority adopts a preliminary resolution designating an eligible company as an approved company and preliminarily approving the project of the eligible company as an economic development project prior to July 15, 2002, and the authority adopts a final resolution approving the eligible company as an approved company and the project of the eligible company as an economic development project, and the authority and the eligible company enter into an agreement no later than June 30, 2003, then the approved company thereafter shall be subject to Subchapter 28 of KRS Chapter 154 effective prior to July 15, 2002.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 338, § 41, effective July 15, 2002.